Arkansas, session 2025, HB1989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-112-601 is amended to read as follows:
23-112-601. Necessity for regulation — Legislative findings —
Legislative declaration.
(a) The General Assembly declares that the public interest is affected
by the sale and distribution of used motor vehicles, and it is recognized
that a significant factor of the inducement in making a sale of a used motor
vehicle to a member of the general public is the trust and confidence of the
purchaser in the retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor
vehicle dealer from whom the purchase is made, with the expectancy that the
dealer will remain in business to stand behind and provide service for the
motor vehicle purchased.
*ZRC134*
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
(b) It is therefore found to be necessary to license retail used motor
vehicle dealers and wholesale used motor vehicle dealers and to prohibit
certain acts and set penalties for violations and perpetration of certain
acts by retail used motor vehicle dealers and wholesale used motor vehicle
dealers who are not licensed as new motor vehicle dealers selling used cars
incidental to their new motor vehicle dealership operations, salespersons,
agents, representatives, and employees of retail used motor vehicle dealers
and wholesale used motor vehicle dealers in order to:
(1) Prevent fraud, improper impositions, and other abuses upon
the citizens of this state;
(2) Protect and preserve the investments and properties of the
citizens of this state; and
(3) Foster and keep alive vigorous and healthy competition by
prohibiting unfair practices by which fair and honest competition is
destroyed or prevented.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-112-602(1)—(4), concerning the
definitions related to used motor vehicle buyers protection, are amended to
read as follows:
(1)(A) “Auto auction” means any person who operates or provides
a place of business or facilities for the wholesale exchange of motor
vehicles by and between duly licensed motor vehicle dealers, or from retail
used motor vehicle dealers and wholesale used motor vehicle dealers to
individuals, or individuals to retail used motor vehicle dealers and
wholesale used motor vehicle dealers, or any combination thereof, or any
motor vehicle dealer licensed to sell used motor vehicles, selling used motor
vehicles using an auction format or on consignment.
(B) “Auto auction” also applies to any person who provides
the facilities for or is in the business of selling motor vehicles in an
auction format;
(2) “Designee” means a person or entity that:
(A) Agrees to perform inspections of retail used motor
vehicle dealers and wholesale used motor vehicle dealers under this
subchapter on behalf of the department Division of Arkansas State Police; and
(B) The department division determines is appropriately
suited for serving as a designee under this subchapter;
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
(3) “Drafter” means any person who obtains financing for the
purchase and resale of vehicles of another person or a retail used motor
vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer through the use of the
account of or based on the extension of credit by presenting at the time of
purchase of the subject vehicles a documentary draft for purchase of the
vehicle or who otherwise promises to pay through the accounts or credit of
another person or a retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor
vehicle dealer;
(4) “Licensed location” means the address designated as the
business address of the used motor vehicle dealer on his or her application
for a retail used motor vehicle dealer's license or a wholesale used motor
vehicle dealer's license;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-112-602(7), concerning the definitions
related to used motor vehicle buyers protection, is amended to read as
follows:
(7) “Person” means and includes, individually and collectively,
individuals, firms, partnerships, associations, corporations, trusts, or any
other form of business, individual enterprise, company, or entity;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-112-602(10)(A)(i), concerning the
definitions related to used motor vehicle buyers protection, is amended to
read as follows:
(10)(A)(i) “Used motor vehicle dealer”, hereinafter referred to
as or “dealer”, means any person, retailer, wholesaler, or auto auction who,
for a commission or with intent to make a profit or gain of money or other
thing of value, sells, brokers, exchanges, rents, or leases with the option
to purchase or own, or attempts to negotiate a sale or exchange of an
interest in any used motor vehicle, or who is wholly or in part in the
business of buying, selling, trading, or exchanging used motor vehicles,
whether or not such motor vehicles are owned by the person.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-112-602(11) and (12), concerning the
definitions related to used motor vehicle buyers protection, are amended to
read as follows:
(11) “Used motor vehicle salesperson”, hereinafter referred to
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
as “salesperson”, is anyone who for compensation of any kind operates as a
salesperson, broker, agent, or representative of a retail used motor vehicle
dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer, or any person who attempts to
or in fact negotiates a sale of a vehicle owned partially or entirely by a
retail used motor vehicle dealers or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer, or
a person or drafter using the financial resources, line of credit, or floor
plan of a retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle
dealer to purchase, sell, or exchange an interest in a used motor vehicle;
and
(12)(A) “Wholesaler” or "wholesale used motor vehicle dealer"
means any person, resident or nonresident, who, in whole or in part,
primarily sells used motor vehicles to motor vehicle dealers.
(B) Used Retail used motor vehicle dealers who, incidental
to their primary business, sell motor vehicles to other retail used motor
vehicle dealers and wholesale used motor vehicle dealers are not considered
wholesalers because of their incidental sales.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-112-602, concerning the definitions
related to used motor vehicle buyers protection, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(13) "Convicted" means that a person plead guilty or nolo
contendere to or was found guilty of a criminal offense, including a
conviction that has been sealed or expunged; and
(14) "Retail used motor vehicle dealer" means a person who sells
used motor vehicles to the public.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 23-112-603(a)(3) and (4), concerning the
penalties for a violation of the law concerning used motor vehicle buyers
protection, are amended to read as follows:
(3) A third or subsequent violation is a Class D felony, and the
retail used motor vehicle dealer's or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's
license shall be suspended for three (3) years for each respective third or
subsequent violation; and
(4)(A) In addition to or instead of the penalties listed under
subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section, the Director of the Division of
Arkansas State Police may issue a fine in an amount not to exceed one
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation of this subchapter.
(B) The fines collected under subdivision (a)(4)(A) of
this section shall be remitted to the Division of Arkansas State Police and
shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Division of
Arkansas State Police Fund.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 23-112-603(b), concerning the penalties for
a violation of the law concerning used motor vehicle buyers protection, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) Any person found guilty of selling a used motor vehicle as a
dealer or salesperson while his or her retail used motor vehicle dealer's or
salesperson's license or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's or
salesperson's license is suspended or revoked shall be guilty of a Class C
felony.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 23-112-603(d), concerning the penalties for
a violation of the law concerning used motor vehicle buyers protection, is
amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) A retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor
vehicle dealer licensed under this subchapter shall maintain a licensed
location.
(2) When a retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used
motor vehicle dealer changes or moves his or her licensed location, within
fifteen (15) calendar days of the relocation, the retail used motor vehicle
dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer shall notify the division in
writing of the dealership name, the previous location, and the new location.
(3)(A) If the division determines that the used motor vehicle
dealer's business location of the retail used motor vehicle dealer or
wholesale used motor vehicle dealer has moved and notification to the
division has not been properly made, the division shall levy a fine equal to
the amount of the license fee.
(B) The fine collected pursuant to subdivision (d)(3)(A)
of this section shall be remitted to the division and shall be deposited into
the State Treasury as special revenue to the credit of the division.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code §§ 23-112-604 through 23-112-607 are amended
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
to read as follows:
23-112-604. Powers generally.
(a) The Department Division of Arkansas State Police may promulgate
rules that are necessary to implement, enforce, and administer this
subchapter.
(b) The department division may cancel a dealer's license if the
retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer:
(1) Fails to keep and maintain the requirements of § 23-112-
607(a) and (c) of this subchapter; or
(2) Pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or has been found guilty
of a violation of § 23-112-605.

23-112-605. Violations.
It shall be a violation of this subchapter to knowingly or
intentionally:
(1)(A) Sell a vehicle without a retail used motor vehicle
dealer's license or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license.
(B) The sale of each vehicle shall constitute a separate
offense;
(2) Commit a fraudulent act in selling, purchasing, or otherwise
dealing in motor vehicles;
(3) Fail to maintain the conditions and requirements necessary
to qualify for the issuance of a retail used motor vehicle dealer's license
or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license;
(4) Sell, attempt to sell, or advertise for sale vehicles from a
location other than that set forth on the retail used motor vehicle dealer's
license or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license, except:
(A) As a participating dealer in a state trade association
promotion or exhibit; or
(B) With a special sale permit; or
(C) At an auto auction;
(5) Falsify, alter, or neglect to endorse or deliver a
certificate of title to a transferee or lawful owner, or fail to properly
designate a transferee on a document of assignment or certificate of title;
(6) Knowingly purchase, sell, or otherwise acquire or dispose of
a stolen motor vehicle;
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
(7) Submit a false affidavit setting forth that a title has been
lost or destroyed;
(8) Pass title or reassign title as a retail used motor vehicle
dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer without a retail used motor
vehicle dealer's license or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license or
when his or her retail used motor vehicle dealer's license or wholesale used
motor vehicle dealer's license has been suspended;
(9) To represent oneself as a retail used motor vehicle dealer
or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer or as a salesperson, either verbally
or in any advertisement, when not licensed as such;
(10) Violate any provision or requirement in this subchapter; or
(11) Knowingly assist an unlicensed retail used motor vehicle
dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer in the sale of a motor
vehicle.; or
(12) Misuse a:
(A) Dealer's master plate or dealer's extra license plate
under § 27-14-1704;
(B) Transporter plate under § 27-14-1806; or
(C) Wholesale used motor vehicle dealer master plate,
wholesale used motor vehicle extra dealer plate, or wholesale used motor
vehicle dealer transporter plate under § 23-112-623.

23-112-606. License required.
It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in business as a retail
used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer or to sell a
vehicle not his or her own without obtaining a retail used motor vehicle
dealer's license or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license, except
that a person defined as a salesperson in § 23-112-602 may act on behalf of
the dealer by whom such a person is employed.

23-112-607. Dealer's license.
(a)(1) Persons wishing to obtain a retail used motor vehicle dealer's
license or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license shall submit a fully
executed application on such retail used motor vehicle dealer's license or
wholesale used motor vehicle dealer application forms as may be prescribed by
the Department Division of Arkansas State Police.
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
(2) The application shall be verified by the oath or affirmation
of the applicant.
(b)(1) An applicant for a used motor vehicle dealer's license or a A
licensee seeking to renew a retail used motor vehicle dealer's license or
wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license shall establish that he or she
has sold at least five (5) ten (10) used motor vehicles during the previous
calendar year.
(2) A licensee shall possess and present valid and signed copies
of certificates of title and bills of sale upon a random audit or yearly
renewal inspection by the division.
(c) The department In addition to an application for a retail used
motor vehicle dealer's license or a wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's
license, the division shall require in relation to the application the
following information and verification prior to issuing a retail used motor
vehicle dealer's license certificate or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's
license certificate:
(1) A photograph of the business location;
(2) A Proof that the applicant possesses a corporate surety bond
in the sum of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000);
(3) Proof of liability insurance coverage on all vehicles to be
offered for sale in an amount equal to or greater than the amount required by
the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, § 27-19-101 et seq.;
(4) A list of the persons or entities having any ownership
interest in the used vehicle dealership;
(5) A list of managers or salespersons to be employed;
(6) That Evidence that the applicant has a bona fide an
established place of business used primarily for the sale of used motor
vehicles that:
(A) Includes an enclosed building or structure; and
(B) Is owned, rented, or leased by the applicant and is
occupied and used primarily for the sale of used motor vehicles;
(7) That Evidence that the applicant has a telephone number
listed in the name of the business in an online directory;
(8) That A photograph demonstrating that the applicant has a an
exterior sign that: identifying
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
(A) Identifies the establishment as a used motor vehicle
dealership; and
(B) Is legible from the street, road, or highway, and a
picture thereof;
(9) That Evidence that the applicant has an office space
dedicated to the business that contains a filing cabinet or other repository
adequate to secure the business records of the establishment under lock and
key or combination;
(10) Whether A disclosure as to whether the applicant has ever:
(A) been Been issued a retail motor vehicle dealer's
license or wholesale motor vehicle dealer's license,; and
(B) if the applicant has ever had Had a retail motor
vehicle dealer's license or wholesale motor vehicle dealer's license
suspended or revoked;
(11)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(11)(B) of this
section, an An affidavit from a department division officer or a designee of
the department division stating that the officer or a designee of the
department division has inspected the facility within thirty (30) sixty (60)
days before issuance or renewal of a license and found it to be in compliance
with the requirements for application.
(B) If a licensee has been continuously licensed at the
same facility for ten (10) years or more, then the licensee shall only be
required to comply with subdivision (c)(11)(A) of this section one (1) time
every other year; and The owner of the facility being inspected under
subdivision (c)(11)(A) of this section or the owner's designated power of
attorney shall be present for the inspection before the issuance or renewal
of a license;
(12) The name, address, and telephone number of the person
designated to receive legal process in the event of the commencement of any
legal action in any court against the applicant;
(13) A copy of a valid driver's license for each owner, partner,
manager, and salesperson listed on the application; and
(14)(A)(i) A criminal record check conducted at the time of
issuance or renewal of a license of each owner, partner, manager, and
salesperson by the division and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(ii) Criminal history records from the Arkansas
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
Crime Information Center shall be available to the Director of the Division
of Arkansas State Police for the review of an applicant.
(B) The state and national criminal background check
required under this subdivision (c)(14) shall:
(i) Conform to applicable federal standards; and
(ii) Include the taking of fingerprints.
(C) The applicant shall:
(i) Sign a release of information to the director;
and
(ii) Pay any fee associated with the state and
national criminal background check.
(D) Upon completion of the state and national criminal
background check required under this subdivision (c)(14), the division shall
forward to the director all releasable information obtained concerning the
applicant.
(E)(i) The division shall not issue a new license to a
person who has been found guilty of a Class Y, Class A, or Class B felony,
including a sealed or expunged offense, in any court in the state or a
comparable offense in another state or in a military or federal court for
which a pardon has not been granted.
(ii) An applicant who has been found guilty of a
Class D or Class C felony shall be disqualified for a period of ten (10)
years from the date of adjudication.
(F) The director may deny, suspend, or revoke a retail
used motor vehicle dealer's license or a wholesale used motor vehicle
dealer's license for an arrest or indictment of a felony listed under
subdivision (c)(14)(E) of this section.
(G) The division shall promulgate rules to implement and
administer this subdivision (c)(14).
(H)(i) A holder of a current and valid retail used motor
vehicle dealer's license or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license who
possesses a license before the effective date of this act is exempt from
disqualification under subdivision (c)(14)(E) of this section for a felony
conviction before the effective date of this act.
(ii) A holder of a current and valid retail motor
vehicle dealer's license or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license who
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
possesses a license before the effective date of this act shall be
disqualified for a felony arrest or conviction that occurs after the
effective date of this act.
(d)(1)(A) Each applicant shall obtain a corporate surety bond in the
penal sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) on a bond form approved by the state.
(B) However, an applicant for a license at multiple
locations may provide a corporate surety bond in the penal sum of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) covering
all licensed locations in lieu of separate bonds for each individual
location.
(2) The bond shall be an indemnity for any loss and reasonable
attorney's fees sustained by a retail buyer by reason of the acts of the
person bonded when such an act constitutes a violation of this law.
(3) However, the surety shall in no event be liable for more
than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
(4) The bond shall be executed in the name of the State of
Arkansas or any aggrieved party.
(5) The proceeds of the bonds shall be paid either to the State
of Arkansas or to the retail buyer upon a judgment from an Arkansas court of
competent jurisdiction against the principal and in favor of the aggrieved
party or the State of Arkansas.
(6) However, the surety shall in no event be required to pay any
judgment obtained by fraud or collusion, as between the dealer and the retail
buyer, or which was rendered against a person bonded for an act that does not
constitute a violation of this subchapter. These defenses may be raised at
any time, subject to the applicable statute of limitations.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 23-112-611(a), concerning records that a
used motor vehicle dealer must maintain, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Every person required to have a license shall maintain, for
three (3) years from the date of purchase, records of each vehicle
transaction to which the person was a party.
(2) Records maintained under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall be maintained at the business location listed on the license of the
person required to maintain the records.
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 23-112-613 is amended to read as follows:
23-112-613. Delivery prior to sale — Disclosures — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Contract for sale” means the final agreement between a
retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer and a
consumer that:
(i) Includes all material terms of the sale of a
motor vehicle; and
(ii) Is binding upon the seller, the buyer, and any
necessary third-party financer.
(B) “Contract for sale” includes a financing agreement and
all material financing terms if the motor vehicle is to be financed; and
(2) “Delivery prior to sale” means a delivery of a motor vehicle
by a retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer
to a consumer prior to the completion and execution by both parties of a
contract for sale.
(b) If a retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor
vehicle dealer engages in a delivery prior to sale, then the retail used
motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer shall provide the
consumer with an agreement for delivery prior to sale at the time of delivery
of the motor vehicle to the consumer.
(c)(1) The agreement for delivery prior to sale shall be:
(A) Printed in at least 12-point type; and
(B) Signed by the consumer and the retail used motor
vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer or the dealer's
representative.
(2) The agreement for delivery prior to sale shall not be
considered a contract for sale.
(d) The agreement for delivery prior to sale shall include all of the
following terms:
(1) Unless the consumer is approved for financing and both
parties have executed a contract for sale, then the retail used motor vehicle
dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer shall not:
(A) Deposit or cash any down payment provided by the
consumer; and
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
(B) Sell any motor vehicle that is presented by the
consumer as a trade-in;
(2) The consumer retains the right to cancel the purchase of a
motor vehicle if:
(A) The retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used
motor vehicle dealer changes any terms; or
(B) The consumer fails to obtain financing that meets the
agreed-upon interest rate;
(3) If a consumer who executes an agreement for delivery prior
to sale chooses not to execute a contract for sale or otherwise cancels the
purchase as provided under this section, then:
(A) The retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used
motor vehicle dealer shall not:
(i) Impose any charge or penalty against the
consumer; or
(ii) Deposit or cash any down payment provided by
the consumer; and
(B) The retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used
motor vehicle dealer shall immediately return any motor vehicle that was
presented by the consumer as a trade-in; and
(4) If the consumer decides not to purchase the motor vehicle,
the consumer shall return the motor vehicle to the retail used motor vehicle
dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer within forty-eight (48) hours
after the consumer notifies the retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale
used motor vehicle dealer.
(e) If a consumer fails to return a motor vehicle pursuant to
subdivision (d)(4) of this section, then the retail used motor vehicle dealer
or wholesale used motor vehicle dealer may recover the vehicle without the
necessity of judicial process if the recovery is possible without committing
an act of breaking or entering or breach of the peace.
(f) The Division of Arkansas State Police shall promulgate rules to
implement, enforce, and administer this section.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 23-112-617(a)—(c), concerning used motor
vehicle dealer service and handling fees, are amended to read as follows:
(a) A retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
dealer may fill in the blanks on standardized forms in connection with the
sale or lease of used motor vehicles if the motor vehicle dealer does not
charge for the service of filling in the blanks or otherwise charge for
preparing documents.
(b)(1) A retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor
vehicle dealer may charge a service and handling fee in connection with the
sale or lease of a used motor vehicle for:
(A) The handling, processing, and storage of documents;
and
(B) Other administrative and clerical services.
(2)(A) The service and handling fee may be charged to allow cost
recovery for retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle
dealers.
(B) A portion of the service and handling fee may result
in profit to the used motor vehicle dealer.
(c)(1)(A) The Department Division of Arkansas State Police shall
determine by rule the amount of the service and handling fee that may be
charged by a retail used motor vehicle dealer or wholesale used motor vehicle
dealer. (B) The service and handling fee shall be no less
than zero dollars ($0.00) and no more than one hundred twenty-nine dollars
($129).
(2) If a service and handling fee is charged under this section,
the service and handling fee shall be:
(A) Charged to all retail customers; and
(B) Disclosed on the retail buyer's order form as a
separate itemized charge.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 23-112-617(e), concerning used motor
vehicle dealer service and handling fees, is amended to read as follows:
(e) The Department division of Arkansas State Police may promulgate
rules to implement, enforce, and administer this section.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 112, Subchapter 6, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
23-112-618. Used motor vehicle dealer application.
(a) An application for a license under this subchapter shall:
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
(1) Be in the form prescribed by the Director of the Division of
Arkansas State Police; and
(2) Include:
(A) The full name and business address of the applicant;
(B) The name under which the applicant intends to do
business; and
(C)(i) Submission of the applicant's fingerprints.
(ii) An out-of-state applicant shall submit two (2)
classifiable sets of fingerprints, and an in-state applicant shall submit
fingerprints through a harvester or livescan operator located within the
state;
(D) A verified statement disclosing any record of arrests,
pending criminal charges, or convictions of the applicant of a felony,
including a felony that has been sealed or expunged;
(E) For an applicant who is an individual:
(i) Any information required by the director that
would show that the applicant is honest, trustworthy, and of good character;
and
(ii) The Social Security number of the applicant;
and
(F) For an applicant who is not an individual, the
taxpayer identification number of the applicant.
(b)(1)(A) A first-time applicant or an applicant for license or
credential renewal shall apply to the Division of Arkansas State Police for a
state and national criminal background check to be conducted by the division
and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(B) Criminal history records from the Arkansas Crime
Information Center shall be available to the director for the review of an
applicant.
(2) The state and national criminal background check required
under this subsection shall:
(A) Conform to applicable federal standards; and
(B) Include the taking of fingerprints as required in
subdivision (a)(2)(C) of this section.
(3) The applicant shall:
(A) Sign a release of information to the director; and
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
(B) Pay any fee associated with the state and national
criminal background check.
(4) Upon completion of the state and national criminal
background check required under this subsection, the division shall forward
to the director all releasable information obtained concerning the applicant.
(c) The burden is on the applicant to provide information that is
sufficient to allow the director to determine if the applicant is qualified
to hold a license under this subchapter.

23-112-619. Fingerprint cards.
(a) The Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police
may retain the fingerprints collected for an individual who is fingerprinted
under this subchapter.
(b) The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may enroll a
person issued a license under this subchapter in a program that
electronically notifies law enforcement if the person has been arrested.

23-112-620. Retail used motor vehicle dealer.
(a) An applicant for a retail used motor vehicle dealer's license
shall provide a certificate of good standing from the Secretary of State to
the Division of Arkansas State Police with the application for a retail used
motor vehicle dealer's license.
(b)(1) A retail used motor vehicle dealer is limited to four (4)
dealerships per business location.
(2) A retail used motor vehicle dealer shall maintain a minimum
vehicle inventory of at least five (5) vehicles per dealership at the
business location of the retail used motor vehicle dealer.
(3) A retail used motor vehicle dealer shall meet the annual
sales requirements under § 23-112-607(b)(2).

23-112-621. Wholesale used motor vehicle dealer.
(a) An applicant for a wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license
shall submit a separate application for a wholesale used motor vehicle
dealer’s license to the Division of Arkansas State Police.
(b) A wholesale used motor vehicle dealer is not required to maintain
inventory at the wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's place of business.
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
(c) Unless a wholesale used motor vehicle dealer is also a licensed
retail used motor vehicle dealer, engaging in retail sales is grounds for the
revocation of a wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license.

23-112-622. Procedure for denial of application for license.
(a) The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may deny the
issuance of a license under this subchapter.
(b) The director shall notify the applicant in writing of the
director's decision to deny the issuance of a license.
(c) An applicant whose application for a license has been denied under
this section may appeal the decision to the director by submitting an appeal
within ten (10) days of the receipt of the notice of denial issued under
subsection (b) of this section.

23-112-623. Used motor vehicle dealer plates — Penalties.
(a) When an applicant for a retail used motor vehicle dealer's license
or a wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license obtains a retail used
motor vehicle dealer's license or a wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's
license, the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue:
(1) To a licensed retail used motor vehicle dealer:
(A) One (1) master plate;
(B) One (1) transporter plate; and
(C) One (1) extra dealer plate; and
(2) To a licensed wholesale used motor vehicle dealer:
(A) One (1) master plate; and
(B) One (1) transporter plate.
(b) The holder of the retail used motor vehicle dealer's license or
wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license shall be the only person to
possess a master plate issued under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Only one (1) salesperson or manager may possess and use the extra
dealer plate.
(d) Misuse of a used motor vehicle dealer plate shall result in the
confiscation of the used motor vehicle dealer plate by law enforcement or an
inspector assigned to the Division of Arkansas State Police Used Motor
Vehicle Division.
(e)(1)(A) A person who violates this section is subject to a civil
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.
(B) A person who violates this section shall surrender the
dealer plates issued under subsection (a) of this section to law enforcement.
(2) The division shall assess penalties for a violation of this
section by written notice to the violator.
(3) If a civil penalty assessed under this section is not paid
within forty-five (45) days of notice of the violation, the wholesale used
motor vehicle dealer's license or the retail used motor vehicle dealer's
license, or both, of the person who committed the violation shall be
suspended.
(4) Upon a third or subsequent violation of this section, the
wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license or the retail used motor
vehicle dealer's license, or both, of the person who committed the violation
shall be revoked.
(f) A civil penalty assessed under this section shall be remitted to
the division and shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of
the Division of Arkansas State Police Fund.

23-112-624. Grounds for disciplinary action.
(a) The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may suspend
or revoke a license or issue a fine in an amount not to exceed one thousand
dollars ($1,000) for each violation of this subchapter.
(b) The director may deny an application or renewal for a license on
proof that the applicant or licensee:
(1) Violated this subchapter or violated a rule promulgated
under this subchapter;
(2) No longer meets the qualifications for a license under this
subchapter; or
(3) Has been arrested for an offense that, if convicted, would
result in disqualification for the license under this subchapter.
(c)(1) The director may summarily suspend a license issued under this
subchapter for no more than sixty (60) days if it is shown that the health,
safety, or welfare of the public is endangered.
(2) If a hearing on a license that has been summarily suspended
is adjourned at the request of the licensee, the suspension may be continued
for the additional period of the adjournment.
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134

HB1989
(d) The director may suspend a license of a person who is found guilty
of or has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a felony or a crime involving
an act of violence in this state or a comparable offense in another state or
territory of the United States or in any foreign country.

23-112-625. License — Record of denial, revocation, or suspension.
If the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police denies an
application, suspends or revokes a license, or imposes a fine under this
subchapter, the director's decision shall be mailed to the applicant or
license holder within sixty (60) days of the director's decision.

23-112-626. Appeal of denial, suspension, or revocation — Venue.
(a) The denial, suspension, or revocation of a license under this
subchapter by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police:
(1) May be appealed to the Pulaski County Circuit Court; and
(2) Shall be governed by § 25-15-212.
(b) Venue for the appeal to circuit court under this section shall be
in Pulaski County, Arkansas.

SECTION 16. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Currently issued
extra dealer plates — Effectiveness.
(a) A currently issued extra dealer plate that is valid and in good
standing with the Division of Arkansas State Police and the Department of
Finance and Administration shall remain active until the expiration date of
the extra dealer plate.
(b) Upon expiration of a currently issued extra dealer plate, the
currently issued extra dealer plate shall be returned to the Department of
Finance and Administration and shall be no longer valid for use by the used
motor vehicle dealer.

SECTION 17. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Dealer's license —
Rules — Promulgation.
The Division of Arkansas State Police shall promulgate rules for the
application and issuance of a retail used motor vehicle dealer's license or
wholesale used motor vehicle dealer's license within one hundred twenty (120)
days of the effective date of this act.
04/03/2025 4:32:37 PM ZRC134